Utah statutes.
7-9-2.   Description of credit unions.
A credit union is a cooperative, nonprofit association, incorporated under
this chapter to encourage thrift among its members, to create sources of
credit at fair and reasonable rates of interest, and to provide an opportunity
for its members to use and control their resources on a democratic basis in
order to improve their economic and social condition.
